Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4222.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1308b. (1) Beginning in the 2019-2020 school year, By not later than July 1, 2026, and at least biennially thereafter, every 3 school years thereafter, a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or, subject to subsection (10), a nonpublic school, shall, in conjunction with at least 1 law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or nonpublic school, conduct a review of the emergency operations plan developed or adopted under described in subsection (2), including a review of the vulnerability assessment under described in subsection (3), or conduct a review of the statewide school safety information policy described under in subsection (4), as applicable. (2) Subject to subsection (3), not later than January 1, 2020, a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or, subject to subsection (10), a nonpublic school shall develop and adopt, and by not later than July 1, 2026 and every 3 school years thereafter, a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy shall update, with input from the public, an emergency operations plan for each school building operated by the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. ?with input from the public. By not later than July 1, 2026 and every 3 school years thereafter, subject to subsection (10), a nonpublic school shall update the emergency operations plan for each school building operated by the nonpublic school. The board of the a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of the a public school academy shall adopt the emergency operations plan by a majority vote of the members serving on the board or board of directors at a public meeting of the board or board of directors held in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (3) The emergency operations plan developed and adopted or updated under subsection (2) must include guidelines and procedures that address at least all of the following: (a) School violence and attacks. (b) Threats of school violence and attacks. (c) Bomb threats. (d) Fire. (e) Weather-related emergencies. (f) Intruders. (g) Parent and pupil reunification. (h) Threats to a school-sponsored activity or event whether or not it is held on school premises. (i) A plan to train teachers on mental health and pupil and teacher safety. (j) A plan to improve school building security. (k) An active violence protocol. (l) Continuity of operations after an incident. (m) A vulnerability assessment. (n) The use of the temporary locking devices or systems described in section 1d of 1937 PA 306, MCL 388.851d, if installed by the school. (4) A school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy that adopts and implements a statewide school safety information policy under section 1308 that meets the requirements under subsection (3) is in compliance with subsection (2). (5) A school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or, subject to subsection (10), a nonpublic school shall provide notice to the department of a completed emergency operations plan review under subsection (1) by not later than 30 days after the completion of the review, in a form and manner prescribed by the department. A school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or nonpublic school shall also provide notice to the department of the adoption or update of an emergency operations plan under subsection (2) by not later than 30 days after the adoption or update of the emergency operations plan, in a form and manner prescribed by the department. (6) At least annually, the department shall provide to the office of school safety within the department of state police a list of each school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or nonpublic school that has not developed and adopted or updated an emergency operations plan under subsection (2). (7) The office of school safety within the department of state police shall coordinate with a law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or, subject to subsection (10), a nonpublic school that has not developed and adopted or updated an emergency operations plan under subsection (2) to notify the governing body of the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or nonpublic school that the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy, or nonpublic school has not developed and adopted or updated an emergency operations plan. (8) An emergency operations plan developed and adopted or updated under subsection (2), any information provided to the department under subsection (5), and any information provided to the office of school safety within the department of state police under subsection (6) is confidential and is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (9) By not later than July 1, 2026, the board of a school district or intermediate school district, board of directors of a public school academy, or, subject to subsection (10), the governing body of a nonpublic school shall ensure that each school operated by the board, board of directors, or governing body has a school crisis team that is responsible for handling a crisis in the event of a safety incident. The school crisis team's responsibilities include, but are not limited to, initiating a lockdown procedure, assisting in evacuation of pupils and staff from the school building, and overseeing parent and pupil reunification. A school crisis team described in this subsection must consist of at least the following members: (a) The principal of the school. (b) The assistant principal of the school, if available. (c) A school resource officer, if available. (d) School safety or security personnel who work at or for the public school or nonpublic school, if available. (e) Any other appropriate school personnel, as determined by the principal of the school. (10) The governing body of a nonpublic school may elect to exempt the nonpublic school from the requirements of this section. (11) (9) As used in this section, "school building" means any of the following: (a) A building intended to be used to provide instruction for pupils, including an addition to an existing building. (b) A recreational or athletic structure or field intended to be used by pupils.